Washington statutes.
RCW 4.48.080

Proceedings on filing of report.

The report of a referee appointed by the court under RCW 4.48.020 shall be filed with the clerk within twenty days after the trial concludes. Either party may, within such time as may be prescribed by the rules of court, or by special order, move to set the same aside, or for judgment thereon, or such order or proceeding as the nature of the case may require.

[ 1984 c 258 s 519; 1957 c 9 s 3; Code 1881 s 255; 1877 p 52 s 259; 1869 p 62 s 259; RRS s 376.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.